en: Caramel junkets
fr: Laits emprésurés au caramel

en: Vanilla junkets
fr: Laits emprésurés vanille

en: Custard puddings
es: Natillas al huevo
fr: Crèmes aux œufs, crèmes aux oeufs, crèmes renversées, crème renversée
hr: Puding od kreme
ja: カスタード・プディング, カスタードプリン

en: Vanilla custard puddings
fr: Crèmes vanille aux œufs, crème renversée vanille

en: Chocolate custard puddings
fr: Crèmes chocolat aux œufs, crème renversée au chocolat

en: Custard puddings with caramel sauce, Custard creams with caramel sauce
es: Natillas de huevo con caramelo
fr: Crèmes caramel aux œufs, Crèmes caramel
hr: Puding od kreme s karamel umakom

en: Refrigerated custard puddings with caramel sauce, Refrigerated custard cream with caramel sauce
fr: Crème caramel rayon frais

en: Crème brûlée, burnt cream, trinity cream
xx: Crème brûlée
bg: Крем брюле
fr: Crèmes brûlées
hr: Crème brûlée
ja: クリームブリュレ

en: Refrigerated caramelized custard cream, Refrigerated crèmes brûlées, Refrigerated crème brûlée
fr: Crèmes brûlées rayon frais, Crèmes brûlées réfrigérées, Crème brûlée rayon frais

en: Crema catalana
xx: Crema Catalana
de: Crema catalana
es: Crema catalana
fi: Crema catalana
fr: Crèmes catalanes
hr: Crema catalana
it: Crema Catalana
ja: クレマカタラーナ, カタラーナ
nl: Crema catalana

en: Panna cottas, panacotta, pannacota, panacota
xx: Panna cotta
de: Panna Cotta, Panna-Cotta
fi: Pannacotta
fr: Panna cottas, pannacottas, Panna cotta, pannacotta, panacotta
hr: Panna cotta
it: Panna cotta
ja: パンナコッタ
nl: Panna cottas

en: Plain panna cottas
fr: Panna cottas natures

en: Panna cottas with fruit coulis
fi: Pannacottat hedelmäcoulis-kastikkeella
fr: Panna cottas au coulis de fruits
hr: Panna cotta s voćnim coulijem
it: Panna cotta con coulis di fruttes

ca: Panna Cotta amb Mango
fr: Panna cottas sur lit de mangue

fr: Panna cotta sur lit de fruit de la passion
es: Pannacotta con maracuya

en: Refrigerated panna cotta
fr: Panna cotta rayon frais

en: Cuajada
xx: Cuajada
ca: Quallada
es: Cuajada
fi: Cuajada
fr: Cuajada
hr: Cuajada

en: Dairy chocolate desserts
de: Milchschokoladendesserts, Desserts mit Michschokolade
es: Postres lácteos con chocolate
fi: Suklaiset maitojälkiruoat
fr: Desserts lactés au chocolat, desserts au chocolat et au lait
hr: Mliječni čokoladni deserti
lt: Šokoladiniai pieno desertai
nl: Desserts op basis van melk en chocola

fr: Desserts lactés à la vanille, desserts lactés vanille
nl: Desserts met vanille

en: Canned semolina puddings
fr: Gâteaux de semoule en conserve, Gâteaux de semoule appertisés